Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-146
Agricultural experiment stations; federal aid; acceptance.

Full and complete assent is given by the State of Nebraska to the provisions of an act of the Sixty-eighth Congress of the United States, Second Session, House Roll No. 157, Calendar No. 1226, approved February 24, 1925, and entitled "An act to authorize the more complete endowment of the agricultural experiment stations, and for other purposes." The University of Nebraska is designated to receive the benefits of said act and to conduct the work and experiments in accordance with said act. The Board of Regents of the university is empowered to receive the grants under the provisions of said act, and is directed to conduct the work and experiments, and make the reports as required by the provisions of said act.

Laws 1925, c. 11, § 1, p. 80;

C.S.1929, § 85-155;

R.S.1943, § 85-146.